Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-24] Investigations and surveys. (a)
The governor or mayor, as applicable, may make investigations and surveys for
the purpose of ascertaining facts to be used in administering this chapter, and
in making the investigations and surveys, may require the making or filing of
schedules or statements, under oath or otherwise; administer oaths; take
evidence under oath; subpoena witnesses; make inspections; and require the
production of books, papers, and records. The circuit court of any circuit or
judge thereof, may enforce by proper proceedings the making or filing of the
schedules or statements; the attendance and testimony of any witness subpoenaed
to appear within the circuit; or the production of books, papers, and records. The
proceedings shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other means or
methods of enforcement.

(b) No person shall be excused from attending
and testifying, or from producing books, papers, or records, before the
governor or mayor or in obedience to the
subpoena of the governor or mayor, or in any cause or proceeding, criminal or
otherwise, based upon or growing out of any alleged violation of this chapter
or any rule or order thereunder, on the ground, or for the reason, that the
testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may
tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or
forfeiture; but no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty
or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning
which the person is compelled after having claimed the person's privilege
against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or
otherwise, except that any individual so testifying shall not be exempt from
prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(c) Witnesses shall be allowed their per diem
fees and mileage as in cases in the circuit courts. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next